Utah statutes.
31A-22-623.   Coverage of inborn metabolic errors.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Dietary products" means medical food or a low protein modified food
product that:
(i)  is specifically formulated to treat inborn errors of amino acid or urea
cycle metabolism;
(ii)  is not a natural food that is naturally low in protein; and
(iii)  is used under the direction of a physician.
(b)  "Inborn errors of amino acid or urea cycle metabolism" means a disease
caused by an inherited abnormality of body chemistry which is treatable by the
dietary restriction of one or more amino acid.
(2)  The commissioner shall establish, by rule, minimum standards of coverage
for dietary products used for the treatment of inborn errors of amino acid or
urea cycle metabolism at levels consistent with the major medical benefit
provided under an accident and health insurance policy.
